Connecticut, session 2026, HB05452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Department of
2 Emergency Services and Public Protection shall pay all lifecycle costs
3 that a municipality incurs as a condition of participating in the
4 Connecticut Land Mobile Radio Network. For purposes of this section,
5 (1) "Connecticut Land Mobile Radio Network" means the state-wide
6 public safety telecommunications system that (A) is administered by the
7 Division of State-Wide Emergency Telecommunications in accordance
8 with chapter 518a of the general statutes, and (B) provides interoperable
9 radio communications for public safety agencies, and (2) "lifecycle costs"
10 means expenses incurred to ensure the software and hardware
11 necessary for participating in the Connecticut Land Mobile Radio
12 Network remain functional and compatible with said network.
13 Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of Emergency
HB5452 / File No. 327 1

HB5452 File No. 327
14 Services and Public Protection shall develop a plan to encourage
15 municipalities to participate in the Connecticut Land Mobile Radio
16 Network, as defined in section 1 of this act. Such plan shall include, but
17 need not be limited to: (1) An assessment of municipal participation in
18 the network; (2) identification of infrastructure needs and long-term
19 costs; (3) consideration of opportunities for regional coordination,
20 shared services and cost reduction strategies; and (4) any
21 recommendations to encourage municipalities to participate in the
22 network.
23 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit the
24 plan to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
25 cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security, in
26 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
PS Joint Favorable
HB5452 / File No. 327 2

HB5452 File No. 327
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Emergency GF - Cost At least At least
Services and Public Protection 1,447,500 1,347,500
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Savings At least At least
1,347,500 1,347,500
Explanation
Section 1 results in a cost to the state of at least $1,347,500 annually
beginning in FY 27 by requiring the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection (DESPP) to pay all "lifecycle costs"1 that a
municipality incurs from participating in the Connecticut Land Mobile
Radio Network (CLMRN). According to DESPP, there are currently 33
relevant sites across the state, at a cost of $17,500 per year per site
(software), and 140 consoles at $5,500 per year per console (hardware),
resulting in the $1,347,500 cost for existing infrastructure currently
incurred by participating municipalities. By shifting these costs to
DESPP, this bill results in an equivalent level of savings for participating
municipalities.
To the extent that additional municipalities opt into CLMRN, costs
1 This estimate assumes "lifecycle costs" are defined as software and hardware
upgrades necessary for participation in CLMRN. It excludes existing maintenance
costs incurred by municipalities of approximately $2.5 million annually.
HB5452 / File No. 327 3

HB5452 File No. 327
for DESPP would increase and newly participating municipalities
would realize savings.
Section 2 requires DESPP to develop a plan to encourage
municipalities to participate in CLMRN, as outlined in the bill. It is
expected that one-time staffing or consultant costs of approximately
$100,000 in FY 27 would be needed to support development of this plan.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and the number of additional
municipalities that opt into CLMRN.
HB5452 / File No. 327 4

HB5452 File No. 327
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5452
AN ACT CONCERNING MUNICIPAL PARTICIPATION IN THE
CONNECTICUT LAND MOBILE RADIO NETWORK AND RELATED
COSTS.